Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3809
Confidentiality and nondisclosure.

(1) Unless otherwise required by law, an employer shall not require disclosure of the details of an employee's or an employee's family member's health information as a condition of providing paid sick time under the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act.

(2) Unless otherwise required by law, any health information possessed by an employer regarding an employee or employee's family member shall:

(a) Be maintained on a separate form and in a separate file from other personnel information;

(b) Be treated as confidential medical records; and

(c) Not be disclosed except to the affected employee or with the express permission of the affected employee.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 436, § 9.